Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8229.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The time within which the Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., Parent-Teacher
Organization incorporated on November 4, 1983 shall file the reports for the years 1983, 1984,
1985, 1986, 1987, 1988, 1989, 1990, 1991, 1992, 1993, 1994, 1995, 1996, 1997, 1998, 1999, 2000,
2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016,
2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025 and 2026, as required under the provisions
of Chapter 6 of Title 7 of the General Laws, 1956, is hereby extended to the 31st day of December,
A.D., 2026, if said corporation shall file in the office of the secretary of state before December 31,
2026, the reports which it should have filed in the said years and shall pay to the secretary of state
the filing fees therefor, having previously thereto paid to the general treasurer for the use of the
state such sum as the attorney general shall decide should be paid by said corporation as a
compromise for the penalty or penalties for its failure to file such reports then the forfeiture or
revocation of the charter of said corporation shall thereupon, to wit, upon the filing of said reports
and the payment of said fees, be vacated and said corporation shall thereupon be entitled to all of
the privileges, benefits and powers and subject to the same duties and liabilities as though no
forfeiture or revocation of its said charter had taken place.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005952
========